src/fst/stems/rootStems.lexc
!!! Most Esperanto words start from roots and become all other parts of speech by their affixes
!!! Example: manĝ- (-i, "to eat." -o, "food." -a, "like food" [adjectival])

!!! mal-san-ul-ej-estr-aĉ-in-o-j-n. 
!!! opposite-health-person-place-boss-detestable-female-noun-plural-accusative
!!! (((opposite-health-person)-place)-(boss-detestable-female)-noun-plural-accusative)
!!! "detestable hospital matrons (Acc)"
!!! So, for the form of a stem:
!!! (prefixes)+(stem)+(postfixes)+(another prefixes-stem-postfixes)+(grammatical ending)

!prefixes.lexc
!stems/roots.lexc
!postfixes.lexc 
!grammatical_endings.lexc (noun endings, adjective endings, adverb endings, verb endings

! Lexicon containing lexical stems:
LEXICON Stems

!AAA
afer        R; !'thing'
aflikt      R; !'afflict'
afrik       R; !"African"
aktiv       R; !"active"
akv         R; !'water'
alfabet     R; !'alphabet'
ali         R; !"other"
alt     	R; !"high"
amerik      R; !'American'
amik        R; !'friend'
angl        R; !'English'
antikv      R; !'ancient, antique'
aper        R; !'appear'
april       R; !"April"
are         R; !'area'
art         R; !'art'
artikol     R; !"article"
asoci       R; !'associate, association'
arab        R; !'Arabian'
armen       R; !"Armenian"
armilar     R; !'armaments'
aŭgust      R; !"August (the month)"
aŭstral     R; !'Australian'
av          R; !'grandfather'
az          R; !"Asian"

!BBB
babil       R; !'chat'
baz         R; !'basic'
berlin      R; !"Berlin"
best        R; !'beast, animal'
blank   	R; !"white"
bibli       R; !'Bible'
bon     	R; !"good"
bonven      R; !"welcome"
brak        R; !'arm'
brazil      R; !'Brazilian'
brit        R; !'British'
brun        R; !'brown'
brust       R; !'chest of a person or animal'
bus         R; !'bus'
buŝ         R; !'mouth'

!CCC
cel         R; !"target/goal"
centr       R; !'center'

!ĈĈĈ
ĉef         R; !'chief, first, important'
ĉefurb      R; !'capital city'
ĉeĥ         R; !'Czech Republic'
ĉiel        R; !"heaven"
ĉili        R; !"Chilean"
ĉin         R; !'Chinese'
ĉokolad     R; !'chocolate'

!DDD
damaĝ       R; !'damage'
dank        R; !"thank"
decembr     R; !"December"
dekstr      R; !'right (opposite of left)'
demand      R; !'ask';
dent        R; !'tooth';
dev         R; !"need"
dimanĉ      R; !"Sunday"
di          R; !'god'
dir         R; !"say"
divers      R; !'diverse'
dolor       R; !'hurt'
dom         R; !'house, home'
don         R; !"give"
dorm        R; !"sleep"
dosier      R; !'file, especially computer file'

!EEE
edz         R; !'husband/spouse'
egipt       R; !"Egyptian"
eklezi      R; !'church'
ekonomi     R; !'economy'
ekster      R; !'outside'
ekzempl     R; !"example"
ekzist      R; !"exist"
elekt       R; !'choose';
epok        R; !'epoch'
esperant    R; !"Esperanto language, or 'the one who hopes'"
est         R; !"be"
eŭrop       R; !'European'
evident 	R; !"obvious"
evit        R; !"evade, avoid"
evolu       R; !'evolution'

!FFF
fal         R; !"fall"
famili      R; !'family'
far         R; !"do/make"
februar     R; !"February"
fek         R; !'excrement, poop'
fil         R; !'son/child'
filozofi    R; !'philosophy'
film        R; !'film, movie'
fin         R; !'final'
fingr       R; !"finger"
flag        R; !'flag'
fort        R; !'strong'
franc       R; !'French'
frat        R; !'brother'
fraz        R; !'phrase'
fru         R; !'early'

!GGG
genu        R; !'knee'
geografi    R; !'geography'
german      R; !'German'
grandioz	R; !"sublime/magnificent"
grand       R; !"large, grand"
grav    	R; !"serious"
grek        R; !'Greek'
griz        R; !"gray/grey"
grup        R; !'group'
gugl        R; !"10 to the 100th power, or Google"

!ĜĜĜ
ĝarden      R; !'garden'
ĝeneral     R; !'general, non-specific'
ĝoj         R; !"joy/enjoy/rejoice"

!HHH
hav         R; !"have"
hebre       R; !"Hebrew"
help        R; !"help"
hispan      R; !'Spain'
histori     R; !"history"
hom         R; !"human"

!III
ideal   	R; !"ideal"
ide         R; !'idea'
ig          R; !'to cause, or make something so'
iĝ          R; !"to become"
il          R; !'tool'
imperi      R; !'empire'
instru      R; !'teach'
internaci   R; !'international'
insul       R; !'island'
ir          R; !"go"
islam       R; !'Islam'
ital        R; !'Italian'

!JJJ
januar      R; !"January"
japan       R; !'Japanese'
jar         R; !"year"
jarcent     R; !'century'
jesu        R; !'Jesus'
jun         R; !"young"
jung    	R; !"yoke/hitch/harness"
juni        R; !"June"
juli        R; !"July"

!ĴĴĴ
ĵaud        R; !"Thursday"
ĵingl       R; !"jingle"

!KKK
kant        R; !"sing"
kap         R; !"head"
kategori    R; !"category"
kelk        R; !'some, a few'
kirk        R; !'church'
kolor       R; !"color" 
komenc      R; !'commence/begin'
kon         R; !'know'
konsist     R; !'consist, be made of'
kongres     R; !'congress'
konstru     R; !'make';
kor         R; !'heart'
koran       R; !'Koran/Quaran'
korp        R; !'body'
kred        R; !"believe"
kresk       R; !'grow'
krist       R; !'Christ'
krokodil    R; !"(speak one's native language when it is expected one speak in Esperanto)"
krur        R; !'leg'
kub         R; !'Cuban'
kultur      R; !'culture'

!LLL
labor       R; !'labor/work'
land        R; !"country"
lang        R; !'tongue'
last        R; !'latest/last'
leg         R; !'read';
leĝ         R; !'law'
lern        R; !'learn;
liber   	R; !"free"
libr        R; !"book"
lig         R; !'fasten, link'
ligil       R; !'web link'
lingv       R; !'language'
lip         R; !'lip'
list        R; !'list'
literatur   R; !'literature'
loĝ         R; !'reside at"
lok         R; !'location/place'
long    	R; !"long"
luks    	R; !"luxurious"
lund        R; !"Monday"

!MMM
mahomet     R; !'Mohammed PBUH'
maj         R; !"May (the month)"
manĝ        R; !'eat';
man         R; !"hand"
mank        R; !'missing, lacking'
map         R; !'map'
mard        R; !"Tuesday"
mar         R; !'ocean/sea'
mart        R; !"March (the month)"
membr       R; !'member'
menton      R; !'chin'
merkred     R; !"Wednesday"
metro       R; !"metro (nominative 'metroo')""
maten       R; !'morning'
matenmanĝ   R; !'breakfast'
milard      R; !"billion"
milion      R; !"million"
milit       R; !"war"
modern      R; !'modern'
mond        R; !"world"
montr       R; !'show/reveal'
mormon      R; !'Mormon'
mort        R; !'death'
mov         R; !'move'
mult        R; !"much, many"
muzik       R; !'music'

!NNN
naci        R; !'nation, people'
nask        R; !"birth"
naz         R; !'nose'
nigr    	R; !"black"
nokt        R; !'night'
nom         R; !"name"
nombr       R; !'number'
nov         R; !'new'
novembr     R; !"November"
nord        R; !'north'

!OOO
oficial     R; !'official'
oft         R; !"often"
okaz        R; !"occur, happen"
okcident    R; !'west'
oktobr      R; !"October"
okul        R; !'eye'
onkl        R; !"uncle"
oportun 	R; !"convenient"
or          R; !'gold'
orient      R; !'east'

!PPP
paĝ         R; !'page/sheet'
pariz       R; !'Parisian'
parol       R; !"speak"
part        R; !"part"
patr        R; !'father'
pen         R; !'attempt, try'
penis       R; !'penis'
pens        R; !"think"
person      R; !"person"
pied        R; !'foot'
piedfingr   R; !'toe'
plat		R; !"flat/slab/sheet"
plur        R; !'plural'
politik     R; !'political
popol       R; !'population'
post        R; !'after'
pov         R; !"can, be able to"
preĝ        R; !'pray'
prezidant   R; !"prezident"
publik      R; !'public'

!RRR
rapid       R; !"quick"
raz         R; !"shave"
referenc    R; !'reference'
reĝad       R; !"reign"
region      R; !"region"
regular     R; !"rule, regulation"
reĝ         R; !'king, royal'
religi      R; !'religion'
respond     R; !'answer'
respublik   R; !'republic'
river       R; !'river'
rom         R; !"Roman"
romp        R; !'break';
rus         R; !'Russian'

!SSS
sabat       R; !"Saturday"
sam         R; !'same'
san 		R; !"health"
sankt       R; !'holy'
sci         R; !"know"
scienc      R; !'science'
septembr    R; !"September"
signif      R; !"signify, mean, represent"
sinjor      R; !"lord"
sistem      R; !'system'
skrib       R; !'write'
slovak      R; !'Slovakian'
soci        R; !'societal'
socialism   R; !'socialism'
soviet      R; !'Soviet'
stomak      R; !'stomach'
strig       R; !'owl'
sud         R; !'south'

!ŜŜŜ
ŝat         R; !'like';
ŝtat        R; !'political state'

!TTT
tag         R; !'day'
tagmanĝ     R; !'lunch'
tek         R; !'capsule, shell, container'
teori       R; !'theory'
temp        R; !'time'
ter         R; !'earth'
tim         R; !'fear'
teritor     R; !'territory' *needs country -i ending?
tradici     R; !'tradition'
traduk      R; !'translate'
trov        R; !'find
tut         R; !'whole, entire'

!UUU
universal   R; !'universal'
universitat R; !'university'
urb         R; !"city"
uson        R; !'American'
uz          R; !'use'

!VVV
vagin       R; !'vagina'
ven         R; !"come"
vendred     R; !"Friday"
verd		R; !"green"
verk        R; !'to create, to produce'
vetur       R; !"travel/ride"
vid         R; !'see';
viv         R; !"life, live"
vizaĝ       R; !'face'
vol         R; !'want';
vort        R; !'word'

!ZZZ
zo          R; !'animal'
!END LEXICON Stem

! Lexicon tags as rootcontaining POS tag only:
LEXICON R
+R: R-pos;  ! goes straight to POS lexicon
+R: Suffix; ! goes to suffix lexicon

! Lexicon containing inflectional suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON R-pos
+V:     V-suff;
+N:o    Number;
+Adj:a  Number;
+Adv:e       #;

!Verbs
LEXICON V-suff
+Past:is    #; !Past
+Pres:as    #; !Present
+Fut:os     #;  !Future
+Inf:i      #;  !Infinitive
+Imp:u      #;  !Imperative
+Cond:us    #;  !Conditional

!Nouns
LEXICON Number
+Sing: Case; !Singular
+Plu:j Case; !Plural

LEXICON Case
+Nom:    #; !Nominative
+Acc:n   #; !Accusative

! manĝ-o-j-n (mangx+R+N+Plu+Acc)

!NEW Words to try:
!   don+R+N+Plu+Acc (donojn) 'gifts'
!   konstru+R+V+Imp (konstruu) 'build!'
!   demand+R+N+Sing+Nom (demando) 'a question'

!Example: $ echo don+R+N+Plu+Acc | hfst-lookup esperanto.hfst
!Example to picture: hfst-fst2txt esperanto.hfst | python3 att2dot.py | dot -Tpng -o esperanto.lexc.png
!\\wsl$\Ubuntu\home\simon\lang-epo\src\fst\stems\roots.lexc

! INLINE LEXC TEST:

!!€gt-desc: rootStems.lexc Noun, Adj, Verb, Adv
!!€ konstrua: konstru+R+Adj+Sing+Nom
!!€ konstruo: konstru+R+N+Sing+Nom
!!€ konstrui: konstru+R+V+Inf
!!€ konstruojn: konstru+R+N+Plu+Acc
!!€ rapide: rapid+R+Adv
!!€ lingvoj: lingv+R+N+Plu+Nom
!!€ tempojn: temp+R+N+Plu+Acc
!!€ germanio: german+R+Suff+N+Sing+Nom
!
